Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-614.04
Class III electric bicycle, defined.

Class III electric bicycle means a device with the following components:

(1) Two, three, or four wheels;

(2) A saddle or seat for the rider;

(3) Fully operative pedals for propulsion by human power; and

(4) An electric motor:

(a) Not exceeding seven hundred fifty watts of power;

(b) That produces no more than one brake horsepower;

(c) Capable of propelling the bicycle at a maximum design speed of no more than twenty-eight miles per hour on level ground;

(d) That only provides power when the rider is pedaling; and

(e) That does not provide power if the electric bicycle is traveling at a speed of more than twenty-eight miles per hour.

Laws 2023, LB138, § 40.